src/fst/affixes/morphology.lexd
###############################################################################
## QUESTIONS, COMMENTS, AND TODOS ##
###############################################################################
## All reduplicative morphology must be encoded as a Pattern and not as a lexicon
## Is it worth breaking up the morphology into lexical class categories (nouns, verbs, adjectives, etc.)? As they aren't true categories in the language and while words do function in these broad categories in context they often borrow morphology
## Similar to the above comment, should I include a <V> tag? How to treat verbs nominalized only syntactically (not morphologically)? (Ex: Ang nagabasa)
## When there is more than one affix for a function (i.e. adjectives, distributives, diminutives), should I have a different tag for each?
## The problem with the patterns currently is that only suffix patterns can be listed as optional because that still puts the tags at the end. Also A3, A8, A9, and A10 (ulu?) have multiple parts so they even more so can't be listed as optional.
## How do I treat abbreviations? ('ka, 'ga, etc.)
